Hawaii, session 2025, HB962.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1. The legislature finds that a well-equipped and staffed library is essential for fostering student learning, personal growth, and academic success.  Equitable access to educational resources is a fundamental right of every student, ensuring that all students have the tools they need for academic achievement.  Furthermore, schools with a strong school library program and a licensed school librarian provide their students with the best chance to succeed.  This is evidenced by more than sixty education and library research studies that demonstrate that strong school library programs staffed by licensed school librarians help students do better academically, even when other school variables are considered. The legislature further finds that in Hawaii, only twenty-four per cent of Hawaii's public schools are staffed with licensed school librarians.  Schools on a neighbor island are far less likely to have a licensed librarian.  Additionally, only twelve public schools are intended to be served by a combination public and school libraries, yet only one of those combination libraries has a licensed school librarian. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish and administer a two-year school librarian pilot program to provide funding for qualifying schools to hire librarians. SECTION 2.  (a) The department of education shall establish and administer a two-year school librarian pilot program to provide financial support to department of education schools for the hiring of qualified librarians. (b)  To qualify for funding under the school librarian pilot program, a department of education school shall demonstrate to the department of education that: (1)  The school has a library space that qualifies as basic, as determined by the department under the department's Elements of a Quality School Library Media Program standards; and (2)  The funds awarded under the pilot program shall be used to hire or retain a librarian who meets the basic requirements, as determined by the department under the department's Elements of a Quality School Library Media Program standards. (c)  Funds awarded under this section shall be used exclusively for librarian salaries and related benefits.  Schools with existing librarian positions and library budgets shall receive funds from the school librarian pilot program as a supplement to, and not as a replacement for, existing resources. (d)  Participating department of education schools who receive funds pursuant to this section shall submit an annual report to the department of education detailing the use of funds and the impact of funds on library services. (e)  The department of education shall establish guidelines and procedures for applications, evaluations, and the disbursement of funds under the school librarian pilot program. (f)  The department of education shall submit an interim report on the status of the school librarian pilot program to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026.  The department of education shall submit a final report on the school librarian pilot program, including any findings, recommendations, and proposed legislation, to the legislature no later twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027. (g)  The school librarian pilot program shall cease to exist on June 30, 2027. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment and administration of the school librarian pilot program pursuant to section 2 of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________